Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.111, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1e. new text end new text begin Free school meals program required notice. new text end new text begin (a) A school district site or charter school site that qualifies for the free school meals program but does not participate in the free school meals program under subdivision 1c must annually provide notice to parents and students enrolled at the site. new text end new text begin (b) The notice must be in writing and must at least: new text end new text begin (1) indicate that the school site does not participate in the free school meals program; new text end new text begin (2) estimate the amount that the average student at the school site will pay in total meal sales fees for the current school year for food that would otherwise be included in a federally reimbursable meal; and new text end new text begin (3) indicate that the student would be eligible to receive breakfast and lunch at no cost if the site participated in the free school meals program. new text end new text begin (c) The site must provide the required notice no later than 15 days after the beginning of each school year. new text end new text begin (d) The site must provide the required notice in the same languages as the application for educational benefits provided to students at that site. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2025-2026 school year and later. new text end